test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_tuulas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tuulâš: # MLO, checked
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Nom: tuulâš
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Gen: tuulii
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Acc: tuulii
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Ill: tulâžân
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Loc: tuuliist
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Com: tuulijn
    tuulâš+N+Sg+Abe: tuuliittáá
    tuulâš+N+Ess: tulâžin
    tuulâš+N+Par: tulâžid
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Nom: tuuliih
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Gen: tuulij
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Acc: tuulijd
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Ill: tuulijd    
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Loc: tuulijn
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Com: [tulijguin, tulijgijn]
    tuulâš+N+Pl+Abe: tulijttáá

  Noun - kuuđâš: # MLO, ok
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Nom: kuuđâš
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Gen: kuuđii
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Acc: kuuđii
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Ill: kuđâžân
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Loc: kuuđiist
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Com: kuuđijn
    kuuđâš+N+Sg+Abe: kuuđiittáá
    kuuđâš+N+Ess: kuđâžin
    kuuđâš+N+Par: kuđâžid
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Nom: kuuđiih
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Gen: kuuđij
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Acc: kuuđijd
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Ill: kuuđijd
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Loc: kuuđijn
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Com: [kuđijguin, kuđijgijn]
    kuuđâš+N+Pl+Abe: kuđijttáá

  Noun - kieđâš:
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Nom: kieđâš
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Gen: kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Acc: kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Ill: kieđâžân
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Loc: kieđiist
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Com: kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Abe: kieđiittáá
    kieđâš+N+Ess: kieđâžin
    kieđâš+N+Par: kieđâžid
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Nom: kieđiih
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Gen: kieđij
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Acc: kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Ill: kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Loc: kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Com: [kieđijguin, kieđijgijn]
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Abe: kieđijttáá

  Noun - mieđâš:
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Nom: mieđâš
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Gen: mieđii
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Acc: mieđii
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Ill: mieđâžân
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Loc: mieđiist
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Com: mieđijn
    mieđâš+N+Sg+Abe: mieđiittáá
    mieđâš+N+Ess: mieđâžin
    mieđâš+N+Par: mieđâžid
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Nom: mieđiih
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Gen: mieđij
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Acc: mieđijd
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Ill: mieđijd
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Loc: mieđijn
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Com: [mieđijguin, mieđijgijn]
    mieđâš+N+Pl+Abe: mieđijttáá
